District of Columbia statutes.
31-5237

Decertification.

(a)

The Commissioner shall conduct an annual review of each Certified Capital Company to determine if the Certified Capital Company is complying with the requirements of certification, to advise the Certified Capital Company as to the eligibility status of its Qualified Investments, and to ensure that no investment has been made in violation of this chapter. The cost of the annual review shall be paid by each Certified Capital Company under a fee schedule adopted by the Commissioner.

(b)

Any material violation of this chapter shall be grounds for decertification of the Certified Capital Company. If the Commissioner determines that a Certified Capital Company is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, the Commissioner shall, by written notice, inform the officers of the Certified Capital Company that the Certified Capital Company is subject to decertification in 120 days from the date of mailing of the notice unless the deficiencies are corrected.

(c)

If the Certified Capital Company is not in compliance with this chapter at the end of the 120-day notice period, the Commissioner may send a notice of decertification to the Certified Capital Company and to all other appropriate District agencies.

(d)

Decertification of a Certified Capital Company may cause the recapture of Premium Tax Credits previously claimed and the forfeiture of future Premium Tax Credits to be claimed by Certified Investors with respect to the Certified Capital Company, as follows:

(1)

Decertification of a Certified Capital Company within 3 years of the Allocation Date shall cause the recapture of all Premium Tax Credits previously claimed and the forfeiture of all future Premium Tax Credits to be claimed by Certified Investors unless the Certified Capital Company has met the requirements for continued certification as provided in this subsection.

(2)

If a Certified Capital Company has met all requirements for continued certification under § 31-5235(a)(1) and subsequently fails to meet the requirements for continued certification under the provisions of § 31-5235(a)(2), the Premium Tax Credits which have been or could be taken, subject to the other provisions of this chapter, by Certified Investors within 3 years from the Allocation Date shall not be subject to recapture or forfeiture; provided, that all other Premium Tax Credits shall be subject to recapture or forfeiture.

(3)

If a Certified Capital Company has met all requirements for continued certification under § 31-5235(a)(1) and (2) and is subsequently decertified, the Premium Tax Credits which have been or could be taken, subject to the other provisions of this chapter, by Certified Investors within 4 years from the Allocation Date shall not be subject to recapture or forfeiture; provided, that all other Premium Tax Credits shall be subject to recapture or forfeiture.

(4)

If a Certified Capital Company has met all requirements for continued certification under § 31-5235(a)(1), (2), and (3) and is subsequently decertified, those Premium Tax Credits which have been or could be claimed, subject to the other provisions of this chapter, by Certified Investors within 5 years from the Allocation Date shall not be subject to recapture or forfeiture. The Premium Tax Credits to be claimed subsequent to the 5th anniversary of the Allocation Date shall be subject to forfeiture only if the Certified Capital Company is decertified within 5 years from the Allocation Date.

(5)

If a Certified Capital Company has invested an amount cumulatively equal to 100% of its Certified Capital in Qualified Investments, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, all Premium Tax Credits shall not be subject to recapture or forfeiture.

(e)

If a Certified Capital Company has invested an amount cumulatively equal to 100% of its Certified Capital in Qualified Investments, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Certified Capital Company shall not be subject to regulation by the Commissioner.

(f)

The Commissioner shall send written notice to each Certified Investor whose Premium Tax Credits have been subject to recapture or forfeiture at the address last shown on the last premium tax filing.

(g)

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-87, § 8, 50 DCR 10982
May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-181, § 2(d), 57 DCR 3388
D.C. Law 18-181, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “this chapter” for “§ 31-5235”; and repealed subsec. (g), which had read as follows: “(g) The Commissioner may waive, pursuant to rules established pursuant to § 31-5239, any recapture or forfeiture of credits if, after considering all facts and circumstances, he or she determines that the waiver will have the effect of furthering the District’s economic development.”
This section is referenced in § 31-5238.